Illinois, session 104th, HB2671.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-117.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-117.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-117.1)7    Sec. 3-117.1. When junking certificates or salvage 8certificates must be obtained.9    (a) Except as provided in Chapter 4 and Section 3-117.3 of 10this Code, a person who possesses a junk vehicle shall within 1115 days cause the certificate of title, salvage certificate, 12certificate of purchase, or a similarly acceptable 13out-of-state document of ownership to be surrendered to the 14Secretary of State along with an application for a junking 15certificate, except as provided in Section 3-117.2, whereupon 16the Secretary of State shall issue to such a person a junking 17certificate, which shall authorize the holder thereof to 18possess, transport, or, by an endorsement, transfer ownership 19in such junked vehicle, and a certificate of title shall not 20again be issued for such vehicle. The owner of a junk vehicle 21is not required to surrender the certificate of title under 22this subsection if (i) there is no lienholder on the 23certificate of title or (ii) the owner of the junk vehicle has   HB2671- 2 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1a valid lien release from the lienholder releasing all 2interest in the vehicle and the owner applying for the junk 3certificate matches the current record on the certificate of 4title file for the vehicle.5    A licensee who possesses a junk vehicle and a Certificate 6of Title, Salvage Certificate, Certificate of Purchase, or a 7similarly acceptable out-of-state document of ownership for 8such junk vehicle, may transport the junk vehicle to another 9licensee prior to applying for or obtaining a junking 10certificate, by executing a uniform invoice. The licensee 11transferor shall furnish a copy of the uniform invoice to the 12licensee transferee at the time of transfer. In any case, the 13licensee transferor shall apply for a junking certificate in 14conformance with Section 3-117.1 of this Chapter. The 15following information shall be contained on a uniform invoice:16        (1) The business name, address, and dealer license 17    number of the person disposing of the vehicle, junk 18    vehicle, or vehicle cowl;19        (2) The name and address of the person acquiring the 20    vehicle, junk vehicle, or vehicle cowl and, if that person 21    is a dealer, the Illinois or out-of-state dealer license 22    number of that dealer;23        (3) The date of the disposition of the vehicle, junk 24    vehicle, or vehicle cowl;25        (4) The year, make, model, color, and description of 26    each vehicle, junk vehicle, or vehicle cowl disposed of by   HB2671- 3 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1    such person;2        (5) The manufacturer's vehicle identification number, 3    Secretary of State identification number, or Illinois 4    State Police number for each vehicle, junk vehicle, or 5    vehicle cowl part disposed of by such person;6        (6) The printed name and legible signature of the 7    person or agent disposing of the vehicle, junk vehicle, or 8    vehicle cowl; and9        (7) The printed name and legible signature of the 10    person accepting delivery of the vehicle, junk vehicle, or 11    vehicle cowl.12    The Secretary of State may certify a junking manifest in a 13form prescribed by the Secretary of State that reflects those 14vehicles for which junking certificates have been applied or 15issued. A junking manifest may be issued to any person and it 16shall constitute evidence of ownership for the vehicle listed 17upon it. A junking manifest may be transferred only to a person 18licensed under Section 5-301 of this Code as a scrap 19processor. A junking manifest will allow the transportation of 20those vehicles to a scrap processor prior to receiving the 21junk certificate from the Secretary of State.22    (b) An application for a salvage certificate shall be 23submitted to the Secretary of State in any of the following 24situations:25        (1) When an insurance company makes a payment of 26    damages on a total loss claim for a vehicle, the insurance   HB2671- 4 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1    company shall be deemed to be the owner of such vehicle and 2    the vehicle shall be considered to be salvage except that 3    ownership of (i) a vehicle that has incurred only hail 4    damage that does not affect the operational safety of the 5    vehicle or (ii) any vehicle 9 model years of age or older 6    may, by agreement between the registered owner and the 7    insurance company, be retained by the registered owner of 8    such vehicle; however, if the registered owner does not 9    agree to retain a vehicle 9 model years of age or older, 10    then the insurance company shall take possession of the 11    vehicle. The insurance company shall promptly deliver or 12    mail within 20 days the certificate of title along with 13    proper application and fee to the Secretary of State, and 14    a salvage certificate shall be issued in the name of the 15    insurance company. Notwithstanding the foregoing, an 16    insurer making payment of damages on a total loss claim 17    for the theft of a vehicle shall not be required to apply 18    for a salvage certificate unless the vehicle is recovered 19    and has incurred damage that initially would have caused 20    the vehicle to be declared a total loss by the insurer.21        (1.1) When a vehicle of a self-insured company is to 22    be sold in the State of Illinois and has sustained damaged 23    by collision, fire, theft, rust corrosion, or other means 24    so that the self-insured company determines the vehicle to 25    be a total loss, or if the cost of repairing the damage, 26    including labor, would be greater than 70% of its fair   HB2671- 5 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1    market value without that damage, the vehicle shall be 2    considered salvage. The self-insured company shall 3    promptly deliver the certificate of title along with 4    proper application and fee to the Secretary of State, and 5    a salvage certificate shall be issued in the name of the 6    self-insured company. A self-insured company making 7    payment of damages on a total loss claim for the theft of a 8    vehicle may exchange the salvage certificate for a 9    certificate of title if the vehicle is recovered without 10    damage. In such a situation, the self-insured shall fill 11    out and sign a form prescribed by the Secretary of State 12    which contains an affirmation under penalty of perjury 13    that the vehicle was recovered without damage and the 14    Secretary of State may, by rule, require photographs to be 15    submitted. 16        (2) When a vehicle the ownership of which has been 17    transferred to any person through a certificate of 18    purchase from acquisition of the vehicle at an auction, 19    other dispositions as set forth in Sections 4-208 and 20    4-209 of this Code, or a lien arising under Section 21    18a-501 of this Code shall be deemed salvage or junk at the 22    option of the purchaser. The person acquiring such vehicle 23    in such manner shall promptly deliver or mail, within 20 24    days after the acquisition of the vehicle, the certificate 25    of purchase, the proper application and fee, and, if the 26    vehicle is an abandoned mobile home under the Abandoned   HB2671- 6 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1    Mobile Home Act, a certification from a local law 2    enforcement agency that the vehicle was purchased or 3    acquired at a public sale under the Abandoned Mobile Home 4    Act to the Secretary of State and a salvage certificate or 5    junking certificate shall be issued in the name of that 6    person. The salvage certificate or junking certificate 7    issued by the Secretary of State under this Section shall 8    be free of any lien that existed against the vehicle prior 9    to the time the vehicle was acquired by the applicant 10    under this Code.11        (3) A vehicle which has been repossessed by a 12    lienholder shall be considered to be salvage only when the 13    repossessed vehicle, on the date of repossession by the 14    lienholder, has sustained damage by collision, fire, 15    theft, rust corrosion, or other means so that the cost of 16    repairing such damage, including labor, would be greater 17    than 50% of its fair market value without such damage. If 18    the lienholder determines that such vehicle is damaged in 19    excess of 50% of such fair market value, the lienholder 20    shall, before sale, transfer, or assignment of the 21    vehicle, make application for a salvage certificate, and 22    shall submit with such application the proper fee and 23    evidence of possession. If the facts required to be shown 24    in subsection (f) of Section 3-114 are satisfied, the 25    Secretary of State shall issue a salvage certificate in 26    the name of the lienholder making the application. In any   HB2671- 7 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1    case wherein the vehicle repossessed is not damaged in 2    excess of 50% of its fair market value, the lienholder 3    shall comply with the requirements of subsections (f), 4    (f-5), and (f-10) of Section 3-114, except that the 5    affidavit of repossession made by or on behalf of the 6    lienholder shall also contain an affirmation under penalty 7    of perjury that the vehicle on the date of sale is not 8    damaged in excess of 50% of its fair market value. If the 9    facts required to be shown in subsection (f) of Section 10    3-114 are satisfied, the Secretary of State shall issue a 11    certificate of title as set forth in Section 3-116 of this 12    Code. The Secretary of State may by rule or regulation 13    require photographs to be submitted.14        (4) A vehicle which is a part of a fleet of more than 5 15    commercial vehicles registered in this State or any other 16    state or registered proportionately among several states 17    shall be considered to be salvage when such vehicle has 18    sustained damage by collision, fire, theft, rust, 19    corrosion or similar means so that the cost of repairing 20    such damage, including labor, would be greater than 50% of 21    the fair market value of the vehicle without such damage. 22    If the owner of a fleet vehicle desires to sell, transfer, 23    or assign his interest in such vehicle to a person within 24    this State other than an insurance company licensed to do 25    business within this State, and the owner determines that 26    such vehicle, at the time of the proposed sale, transfer   HB2671- 8 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1    or assignment is damaged in excess of 50% of its fair 2    market value, the owner shall, before such sale, transfer 3    or assignment, make application for a salvage certificate. 4    The application shall contain with it evidence of 5    possession of the vehicle. If the fleet vehicle at the 6    time of its sale, transfer, or assignment is not damaged 7    in excess of 50% of its fair market value, the owner shall 8    so state in a written affirmation on a form prescribed by 9    the Secretary of State by rule or regulation. The 10    Secretary of State may by rule or regulation require 11    photographs to be submitted. Upon sale, transfer or 12    assignment of the fleet vehicle the owner shall mail the 13    affirmation to the Secretary of State.14        (5) A vehicle that has been submerged in water to the 15    point that rising water has reached over the door sill and 16    has entered the passenger or trunk compartment is a "flood 17    vehicle". A flood vehicle shall be considered to be 18    salvage only if the vehicle has sustained damage so that 19    the cost of repairing the damage, including labor, would 20    be greater than 50% of the fair market value of the vehicle 21    without that damage. The salvage certificate issued under 22    this Section shall indicate the word "flood", and the word 23    "flood" shall be conspicuously entered on subsequent 24    titles for the vehicle. A person who possesses or acquires 25    a flood vehicle that is not damaged in excess of 50% of its 26    fair market value shall make application for title in   HB2671- 9 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1    accordance with Section 3-116 of this Code, designating 2    the vehicle as "flood" in a manner prescribed by the 3    Secretary of State. The certificate of title issued shall 4    indicate the word "flood", and the word "flood" shall be 5    conspicuously entered on subsequent titles for the 6    vehicle.7        (6) When any licensed rebuilder, repairer, new or used 8    vehicle dealer, or remittance agent has submitted an 9    application for title to a vehicle (other than an 10    application for title to a rebuilt vehicle) that he or she 11    knows or reasonably should have known to have sustained 12    damages in excess of 50% of the vehicle's fair market 13    value without that damage; provided, however, that any 14    application for a salvage certificate for a vehicle 15    recovered from theft and acquired from an insurance 16    company shall be made as required by paragraph (1) of this 17    subsection (b). 18    (c) Any person who without authority acquires, sells, 19exchanges, gives away, transfers or destroys or offers to 20acquire, sell, exchange, give away, transfer or destroy the 21certificate of title to any vehicle which is a junk or salvage 22vehicle shall be guilty of a Class 3 felony.23    (d) Except as provided under subsection (a), any person 24who knowingly fails to surrender to the Secretary of State a 25certificate of title, salvage certificate, certificate of 26purchase or a similarly acceptable out-of-state document of   HB2671- 10 -LRB104 03419 LNS 13441 b1ownership as required under the provisions of this Section is 2guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 34 felony for a subsequent offense; except that a person 4licensed under this Code who violates paragraph (5) of 5subsection (b) of this Section is guilty of a business offense 6and shall be fined not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 7for a first offense and is guilty of a Class 4 felony for a 8second or subsequent violation.9    (e) Any vehicle which is salvage or junk may not be driven 10or operated on roads and highways within this State. A 11violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor. A 12salvage vehicle displaying valid special plates issued under 13Section 3-601(b) of this Code, which is being driven to or from 14an inspection conducted under Section 3-308 of this Code, is 15exempt from the provisions of this subsection. A salvage 16vehicle for which a short term permit has been issued under 17Section 3-307 of this Code is exempt from the provisions of 18this subsection for the duration of the permit.19(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-319, eff. 1-1-22; 20102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)